Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.390

United States vocational education account—Moneys transferred to general fund.

All moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the United States vocational education account in the general fund on August 1, 1957, and all moneys thereafter paid into the state treasury for or to said account, shall be and are hereby transferred to and placed in the general fund.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.390. Prior: 1957 c 226 s 1.]